Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. Local Use Tax
§ 39-16-204.
Taxation rate.

In addition to the state tax imposed under W.S.

39-16-101

through

39-16-111

any county of the state may impose the following excise taxes, any city or town may impose the tax authorized by paragraph (vi) of this subsection and any resort district may impose the tax authorized by paragraph (iv) of this subsection:

An excise tax at a rate in increments of one-half of one percent (.5%) not to exceed a rate of two percent (2%) upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property as provided by this article made within the county, the purpose of which is for general revenue;

An excise tax not to exceed two percent (2%) upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property, within the county. The total excise tax imposed within any county under this paragraph shall not exceed two percent (2%). The revenue from the tax shall be used in a specified amount for specific purposes authorized by the qualified electors and as provided in W.S. 39-16-211(b)(iv). Specific purposes shall not include ordinary operations of local government except those operations related to a specific project or as authorized by W.S. 39-16-203(a)(ii)(H);

In no event shall the total excise tax imposed within any county under the provisions of paragraphs (i), (ii) and (v) of this subsection exceed three percent (3%);

An excise tax at a rate in increments of one-half of one percent (.5%) not to exceed a rate of three percent (3%) upon retail sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property as provided by this article made within the resort district, the purpose of which is for general revenue for the resort district;

An excise tax at a rate in increments of one-quarter of one percent (.25%) not to exceed a rate of one percent (1%) upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property as provided by this article made within the county, the purpose of which is for economic development;

An excise tax at a rate in increments of one-quarter of one percent (.25%) not to exceed a rate of one percent (1%) upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property made within the city or town, the purpose of which is for general revenue or for a specific purpose in a specified amount as specified in the proposition to impose the tax.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2003, ch. 23, § 1; ch. 72, § 2; 2005, ch. 239, § 1; 2007, ch. 74, § 1; ch. 133, § 1; 2019 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 88, § 1, effective March 13, 2020; 2020 ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “authorized by paragraph (ii) of this subsection” in the introductory language in (a), added (a)(v), and updated an internal reference accordingly in (a)(iii).

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment by ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “three percent (3%)” for “one percent (1%)” in (a)(iv).

The second 2007 amendment by ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “two percent (2%)” for “one percent (1%)” in (a)(i) and substituted “three percent (3%)” for “two percent (2%)” in (a)(iii).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ii), added “and as provided in W.S. 39-16-211(b)(iv)” following “qualified electors” in the third sentence.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 88, § 1, in (a)(ii) added “or as authorized by W.S. 39-16-203(a)(ii)(H)” at the end.

Laws 2020, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021, in the introductory language of (a) added “any city or town may impose the tax authorized by paragraph (vi) of this subsection” following “excise taxes”; and added (a)(vi).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 133, § 2 states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall affect any tax previously imposed under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i) or 39-16-204(a)(i) and in effect prior to the effective date of this act.”

§ 39-16-205.
Exemptions.

There are no specific applicable provisions for exemptions for this article. The provisions of W.S.

39-16-105

shall apply to the taxes imposed by this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-206.
Licenses; permits.

An additional license to engage in business shall not be required if the vendor has been issued a state license pursuant to law.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-207.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns, reports and preservation of records. There are no specific applicable provisions for returns, reports and preservation of records for this article.

Payment. There are no specific applicable provisions for payment for this article.

Timelines. Local tax rates and boundary changes for purposes of this article shall be effective on the first day of a calendar quarter after sixty (60) days notice has been given to a vendor. In the case of a vendor selling from a printed catalog, the new tax rate shall take effect on the first day of the calendar quarter following one hundred twenty (120) days notice provided to the vendor.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2001, ch. 147, § 2.

§ 39-16-208.
Enforcement.

There are no specific applicable provisions for enforcement for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-209.
Taxpayer remedies.

There are no specific applicable provisions for taxpayer remedies for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-210.
Statute of limitations.

There are no specific applicable provisions for a general statute of limitations for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-211.
Distribution.

For all revenue collected by the department from the taxes imposed under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i), (iv) and (v), the department shall:

For revenues collected under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i):

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to counties imposing the tax and its cities and towns. The distribution to the county and its cities and towns shall be equal to the amount collected in each county less the costs of collection as provided by subparagraph (a)(i)(A) of this section. The distribution shall be as follows:

To the county for deposit into its general fund in the proportion the population of the county situated outside the corporate limits of its cities and towns bears to the total population of the county;

To the incorporated cities and towns within the county for deposit into their treasuries in the proportion the population of each city or town bears to the total population of the county.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a county, city or town receiving distributions under this paragraph may expend not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount received under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph for the purposes of economic development provided:

The intent to use a portion of the amount distributed for economic development was indicated by specific language on the ballot as provided by W.S. 39-16-203(a)(i)(C) or the enactment of a resolution or ordinance stating that a portion of the proceeds would be used for “economic development”;

The county has not imposed a tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(v).

For revenues collected under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(iv):

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to resort districts imposing the tax.

For revenues collected under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(v):

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to counties imposing the tax and its cities and towns. The distribution to the county and its cities and towns shall be equal to the amount collected in each county less the costs of collection as provided by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. The distribution shall be as follows:

To the county for deposit into its general fund in the proportion the population of the county situated outside the corporate limits of its cities and towns bears to the total population of the county;

To the incorporated cities and towns within the county for deposit into their treasuries in the proportion the population of each city or town bears to the total population of the county.

For all revenue collected by the department from the taxes imposed by W.S. 39-16-204(a)(ii), the department shall:

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited by the state treasurer into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to the county treasurer of the county in which the tax has been imposed to be distributed immediately by the treasurer to the sponsoring entity;

Any interest earned from investment of the revenues may only be used for costs related to the purposes approved on the ballot, including operation and maintenance costs, and shall be distributed to each sponsoring entity in the same proportion as its cost is to the total cost of all purposes identified on the ballot;

If taxes collected exceed the amount necessary for the approved purpose, the excess funds shall be retained by the county treasurer for one (1) year for refund of overpayments of the tax imposed pursuant to this act upon order of the department. After one (1) year any interest earned on the excess funds and the excess funds less any refunds ordered shall be deposited in the applicable reserve account authorized by W.S. 39-16-203(a)(ii)(H) or transferred to the county or municipality as specified in the resolution adopted pursuant to W.S. 39-16-203(a)(ii)(A). If the resolution fails to specify how excess funds will be expended and after all approved purposes have been completed, the county treasurer shall transfer the excess funds less any refunds ordered to each city and town within the county in the proportion the population of the city or town bears to the population of the county and to the county in the proportion that the population of the unincorporated areas of the county bears to the population of the county. After a public hearing, with notice of the public hearing published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least thirty (30) days before the public hearing, the governing body of the county and each municipality may appropriate its proportion of excess funds for other specific purposes authorized by a majority vote of the governing body, which shall not include the ordinary operations of local government. Excess funds collected on the propositions approved prior to January 1, 1989, and any interest earned shall be retained by the county treasurer for use in any purposes approved by the electors in accordance with procedures set forth in this section and for refunds of overpayment of taxes imposed pursuant to this act upon the order of the department, except that, with the approval of the governing bodies adopting the initial resolution, the excess funds and any interest earned may be used for the needs of the project for which the tax was approved.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 54, § 2.

For all revenue collected by the department from the taxes imposed by W.S. 39-16-204(a)(vi) the department shall:

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to the city or town in which the tax has been imposed which shall only be used by the city or town for costs related to the purposes approved in the proposition to impose the tax.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 54, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; 2003, ch. 72, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; ch. 239, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 88, § 1, effective March 13, 2020; 2020 ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “an account” for “the trust and agency fund” in (a)(i)(B), (a)(ii)(B), and (b)(ii).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 239, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(i)(C) and (a)(iii), and updated an internal reference in the introductory language in (a).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out as directed by the legislative service office.

The text in subparagraph (a)(iii)(B) has been inserted as the repeal of the trust and agency fund is effective, and funds that would be deposited into the trust and agency fund are to be deposited into an account in accordance with Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “an account” for “the trust and agency fund” in (a)(iii)(B).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the introductory language in (a) and (b); and added “by the state treasurer” in (b)(i).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(iv), added the third and fourth sentences.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 88, § 1, in (b)(iv) substituted “shall be deposited in the applicable reserve account authorized by W.S. 39-16-203(a)(ii)(H) or transferred” for “shall be transferred” in the second sentence.

Laws 2020, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021, added (d).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”